data/grammar/fst/roots-generated.lexc
! Generated by data/grammar/fst/generate_roots.py -- DO NOT HAND-EDIT.
! Rerun that script to regenerate after the source CSVs change.
! See its module docstring for exactly which rows are included/excluded.

Multichar_Symbols +1a +1c +1e +1n +1p +1rp +1rpr +1v +2a +2n +2v +3n +3v +4v

LEXICON ConjunctionsGenerated
amma+1c:amma QParticles ;
amma+1c:angma QParticles ;
amma+1c:anma QParticles ;
kisiani+1c:kisiani QParticles ;
kisimi+1c:kisimi QParticles ;
uvvalu+1c:uvvalu QParticles ;
uvvalu+1c:ubvalu QParticles ;
uvvalu+1c:ugvalu QParticles ;
uvvalu+1c:ukvalu QParticles ;
uvvalu+1c:ulvalu QParticles ;
uvvalu+1c:upvalu QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:uvvaluunniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ubvaluumniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ubvaluungniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ubvaluunniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ugvaluumniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ugvaluungniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ugvaluunniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ukvaluumniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ukvaluungniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ukvaluunniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ulvaluumniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ulvaluungniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:ulvaluunniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:upvaluumniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:upvaluungniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:upvaluunniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:uvvaluumniit QParticles ;
uvvaluunniit+1c:uvvaluungniit QParticles ;
ammalu+1c:ammalu QParticles ;
ammalu+1c:angmalu QParticles ;
ammalu+1c:anmalu QParticles ;
